Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1373
Exposed animals; owner responsibility.

Whenever exposed animals are moving in commerce, it shall be the responsibility of the owner to see that such animals are properly branded, if so required by the department, and to move such animals in accordance with any restrictions imposed by the department. The requirements of the department governing the handling of exposed animals shall be set out in duly adopted and promulgated rules and regulations.

Laws 1983, LB 573, § 7.